Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-24] Modification or correction of
award. (a) Upon motion made within ninety days after the movant receives
notice of the award pursuant to section 658A-19 or within ninety days after the
movant receives notice of a modified or corrected award pursuant to section
658A-20, the court shall modify or correct the award if:

(1) There was an evident mathematical miscalculation
or an evident mistake in the description of a person, thing, or property
referred to in the award;

(2) The arbitrator has made an award on a claim not
submitted to the arbitrator and the award may be corrected without affecting
the merits of the decision upon the claims submitted; or

(3) The award is imperfect in a matter of form not
affecting the merits of the decision on the claims submitted.

(b) If a motion made under subsection (a) is
granted, the court shall modify or correct and confirm the award as modified or
corrected. Otherwise, unless a motion to vacate is pending, the court shall
confirm the award.

(c) A motion to modify or correct an award
pursuant to this section may be joined with a motion to vacate the award. [L
2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next